Washington statutes.
RCW 15.135.070

Department's existing authority.

This chapter does not alter or impair the department's authority for regulating food in intrastate commerce under chapter 15.130 RCW. The department may use its authority for regulating food in intrastate commerce under chapter 15.130 RCW to carry out and enforce the provisions of this chapter. For the purposes of this chapter, farms subject to the produce safety rule are engaged in intrastate commerce of food.

[ 2018 c 106 s 7.]